Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. In General

Editor's notes. —

This article was repealed and renumbered by Laws 2001, ch. 201, effective January 1, 2002. For present similar provisions, see article 2 of this chapter.

§§ 26-9-101 through 26-9-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 3, and Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 153 and 162, related to the applicability of the chapter and license requirements.

§ 26-9-104.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as W.S.

26-9-226

by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3.

§§ 26-9-105 through 26-9-115.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 3; Laws 1955, ch. 34, § 1; and Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 168 through 174, related to requirements, application, and examining for licenses.

§ 26-9-116.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as W.S.

26-9-227

by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3.

§§ 26-9-117 through 26-9-123.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 178 through 183, related to continuation, termination, and temporary licenses.

§§ 26-9-124 through 26-9-126.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as W.S.

26-9-223

through

26-9-225

by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3.

§§ 26-9-127 and 26-9-128.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 187 and 188, related to solicitors and insurance vending machines.

§§ 26-9-129 and 26-9-130.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as W.S.

26-9-228

and

26-9-229

by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3.

§§ 26-9-131 through 26-9-133.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 191, 192, and 195, related to exchange of business, sharing commissions, and nonresident agents.

§§ 26-9-134 and 26-9-135.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as W.S.

26-9-230

and

26-9-219

by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3.

§§ 26-9-136 and 26-9-137.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 196 and 197, related to suspension, revocation, and refusal of licenses.

§§ 26-9-138 through 26-9-142.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered, respectively, as W.S.

26-9-232

,

26-9-220

,

26-9-221

,

26-9-231

, and

26-9-222

by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 4.